Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
CHAPTER 3 Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 894, § 1, repealed and reserved this chapter, relating to the Georgia Agrirama Development Authority, effective July 1, 2001. The former chapter was based on Ga. L. 1970, p. 568, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1161, §§ 1-11; Ga. L. 1975, p. 523, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 713, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 842, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 698, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 598, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 788; Ga. L. 1984, p. 898, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 200, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 872, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 2. For comparable provisions, see Code Sections 12-3-650 through 12-3-661. Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 1, repealed the reservation of Code Sections 2-3-1 through 2-3-12.

2-3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

12-3-470

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Code 1981, §

2-3-1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “This chapter” was substituted for “This part” at the beginning of this Code section.

2-3-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Authority” means the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority.

“Cost of the project” means the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired; the cost of all machinery and equipment; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and for one year after completion of construction; the cost of engineering, architectural, and legal expenses and of plans and specifications and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expense; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this chapter, the construction of any project, the placing of the same in operation, and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction and operation. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of such bonds or obligations as may be issued by any authority, department, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia.

“Project” means and includes one or a combination of two or more of the following: buildings, facilities, and all structures; electric, gas, steam, water, and sewerage utilities; and improvements of every kind and character deemed by the authority necessary or convenient for its purposes.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-471, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Code 1981, §

2-3-2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” in the introductory language and in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (2).

2-3-3.
Creation of authority; membership; vacancies; compensation and reimbursement; record keeping.

There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority which shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the State of Georgia and a public corporation; and by that name, style, and title such body may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts of this state.

The authority shall consist of ten members, including nine appointed members and the Commissioner of Agriculture, ex officio. Initially, appointed members shall serve staggered terms of office as follows: two members for one year, two members for two years, two members for three years, and three members for four years. Thereafter, each appointed member shall serve for a term of four years. All appointed members shall be appointed by the Governor, confirmed by the Senate, and shall serve until the appointment and qualification of a successor. The members appointed by the Governor shall be selected from the state at large but shall be representative of all of the geographic areas of the state. Such members also shall represent the state’s agriculture and business interests. The Governor is authorized to appoint any elected or appointed state, county, municipal, or school board official or employee, except officials and employees of the legislative or judicial branches of state government, as members of the authority, and any person so appointed is authorized to serve as a member of the authority.

All successors to appointed members shall be appointed in the same manner as original appointments. Vacancies in office of appointed members shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. The authority shall elect its own officers. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise all rights and perform all duties of the authority.

The appointed members of the authority shall receive a daily expense allowance and reimbursement for transportation costs as provided for in Code Section 45-7-21; and the members of the authority shall not receive any other compensation for their services as such.

The authority shall have perpetual existence. Any change in name or composition of the authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any person under this chapter or impair the obligations of any contracts existing under this chapter.

The members of the authority shall be accountable in all respects as trustees. The authority shall keep suitable and proper books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind and shall submit for inspection all the books, together with the proper statement of the authority’s financial position, to the state auditor.

The authority is assigned to the Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes only.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-472, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 6, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p.261, § 2/HB 125; Code 1981, §

2-3-3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” twice in the last sentence of subsection (e).

2-3-4.
Purpose and general business of authority.

The corporate purpose and the general nature of the business of the authority shall be:

The provision of a facility for the agricultural community to present, exhibit, and promote its products and livestock to agribusiness persons and the public in an effort to boost the state’s economy;

The exhibition and promotion of agricultural accomplishments by the youth of this state;

The provision of facilities and programs for public events, exhibits, and other activities, such as, but not limited to, fairs, nonagricultural exhibits, concerts, rodeos, flea markets, and auctions, which will make the authority as financially self-supporting as possible, benefit the state’s economy, and attract the traveling public; and

The promotion and staging of a state-wide fair at least once a year to accomplish one or more of the above purposes.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-473, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 1197), the General Assembly authorized the designation of the main exhibition building at the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Center as the “Sam P. McGill Exhibition Building.”

By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 1198), the General Assembly authorized the designation of the show arena at the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Center as the “Henry L. Reaves Arena.”

2-3-5.
Powers of authority generally.

The authority is authorized:

To have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for its corporate purposes;

To appoint, select, and employ officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts and fiscal agents; to contract for the services of individuals or organizations not employed full time by the authority who or which are engaged primarily in the rendition of personal services rather than the sale of goods or merchandise, such as, but not limited to, the services of accountants, engineers, architects, consultants, and advisors, and to allow suitable compensation for such services; and to make provisions for group insurance, retirement, or other employee benefit arrangements, provided that no part-time or contract employees shall participate in group insurance or retirement benefits;

To make contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects or contracts with respect to the leasing or use of projects which the authority causes to be subdivided, erected, or acquired;

To plan, survey, subdivide, administer, construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects as defined in this chapter, such projects to be located on property owned or leased by the authority or the State of Georgia or under the control and management of the authority. The cost of any such project shall be paid from its income, from the proceeds of revenue anticipation certificates of the authority, or from such proceeds and any loan, gift, or grant from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or the State of Georgia, or any county, municipal corporation, authority, or local government or governing body;

To accept loans or grants, or both, of money, materials, or property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America or such agency or instrumentality may impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue anticipation certificates from earnings of such projects, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To exercise any power which is usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions and which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state;

To act as agent for the United States of America or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any manner within the purposes or powers of the authority;

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed as the authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business;

To receive and accept loans, gifts, grants, donations, or contributions of property, facilities, or services, with or without consideration, from any person, firm, or corporation or from the State of Georgia, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any county, municipal corporation, or local government or governing body;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income, as gifts, or as appropriations by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of this authority;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers and purposes of the authority;

To acquire, lease (as lessee), purchase, hold, own, and use any franchise or any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein; and to sell, lease (as lessor), transfer, or dispose thereof whenever the same is no longer required for purposes of the authority or exchange the same for other property or rights which are useful for the purposes of the authority;

To fix, alter, charge, and collect fares, rates, rentals, and other charges for its facilities and for admission to its grounds at reasonable rates to be determined by the authority;

To contract with the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission for the construction of the project as provided for in Article 2 of Chapter 17 of Title 50; or to contract with other authorities, departments, or agencies of the State of Georgia for the construction of the project;

To invest and reinvest any or all idle funds or moneys, including, but not limited to, funds held in reserve or debt retirement or received through the issuance of revenue certificates or from contributions, gifts, or grants, which cannot be immediately used for the purpose for which received, such investment to be made in any security or securities which are legal investments for executors or trustees; provided, however, that investments in such securities will at all times be held for and, when sold, used for the purposes for which the money was originally received;

To grant, on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, the right to use and occupy streets, roads, sidewalks, and other public places for the purpose of rendering utility services, upon such conditions and for such time as the authority may deem wise;

To appoint special advisory committees and panels of citizens to advise the authority of certain issues and to reimburse the individuals appointed for actual expenses incurred in performing their tasks;

To select a site for the building of a state agricultural exposition and state fair center; and

To sell, upon obtaining a license from the Department of Revenue, alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only upon property operated and controlled by the authority.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-474, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Code 1981, §

2-3-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (5).

2-3-6.
Public purpose of authority; tax and assessment exemptions.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and constitute a public purpose and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter. The State of Georgia covenants that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the facilities erected, maintained, or acquired by it or any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such facilities or other income received by the authority; provided, however, in no event shall the exemptions granted in this Code section extend to any lessee or other private person or entity.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-475, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-6

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” at the end of the first sentence.

2-3-7.
Exercise of police powers by authority.

The authority is authorized to exercise such of the police powers of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all zoning, use, and personal conduct restrictions upon the properties, facilities, and persons under its jurisdiction to the extent that such is lawful under the laws of the United States and this state. The authority may delegate all or any part of the performance of these functions temporarily or permanently to the state or to the county in which its facilities are located.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-476, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Code 1981, §

2-3-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

2-3-8.
Authorization for security force.

The authority is authorized to contract for or to provide for and maintain a security force with respect to the facilities and property owned, leased, operated, or under the control of the authority and within the territory thereof. The security force shall have the duty to protect persons and property, disperse unlawful or dangerous assemblages, control pedestrian and vehicular traffic, and otherwise preserve and protect the public peace, health, and safety. For these purposes, a member of such force shall be a peace officer and, as such, shall have authority equivalent to the authority of a policeman or law enforcement officer of the county in which he is discharging his duties.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-477, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

2-3-9.
Receipts deemed trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this chapter, whether as grants or other contributions or as revenues, rents, and earnings, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-478, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-9

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” twice in this Code section.

2-3-10.
Setting rentals and other charges.

The authority is authorized to fix rentals and other charges which any user, exhibitor, concessionaire, franchisee, or vendor shall pay to the authority for the use of the project or part thereof or combination thereof, and to charge and collect the same, and to lease and make contracts with political subdivisions and agencies with respect to use of any part of the project. The rentals and other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect to the aggregate thereof from the project or any part thereof so as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues of such project, if any, to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project, including the reserves for extraordinary repairs and insurance, unless such cost shall be otherwise provided for, which cost shall be deemed to include the expenses incurred by the authority on account of the project for water, light, sewer, and other services furnished by other facilities at the project.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-479, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

2-3-11.
Legal services of Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the authority and in connection therewith the provisions of Code Sections 45-15-13 through 45-15-16 shall be fully applicable.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-480, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

2-3-12.
Venue and jurisdiction for actions under chapter or against authority.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this chapter shall be brought in the Superior Court of Houston County, Georgia; and such court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions.
Furthermore, the venue for actions brought against the authority shall be in the Superior Court of Houston County, Georgia; and such court shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions.
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to impair any rights afforded the state under the Constitution of the United States.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-481, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 590, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-12

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” in the first and last sentences of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 590, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides in part that this Act shall apply with respect to all actions filed on or after March 29, 1994.

2-3-13.
Conflict of interest; full disclosure.

Every member of the authority and every employee of the authority who knowingly has any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract to which the authority is or is about to become a party, or in any other business of the authority, or in any firm or corporation doing business with the authority shall make full disclosure of such interest to the authority. Failure to disclose such an interest shall constitute cause for which a member of the authority may be removed or an employee discharged or otherwise disciplined at the discretion of the authority.

The provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 and Code Sections 16-10-21, 16-10-22, 16-10-92, and 16-10-93, regulating the conduct of officers, employees, and agents of political subdivisions, municipal and other public corporations, and other public organizations, shall be applicable to the conduct of members, officers, employees, and agents of the authority.

Any contract or transaction of the authority involving a conflict of interest which is not disclosed under subsection (a) of this Code section, or involving a violation of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 or Code Section 16-10-21, 16-10-22, 16-10-92, or 16-10-93, or involving a violation of any other provision of law regulating conflicts of interest which is applicable to the authority or its members, officers, or employees shall be voidable by the authority.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-482, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Code 1981, §

2-3-13

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “Code Section” was substituted for “Code Sections” in subsection (c).

2-3-14.
Power of authority to issue revenue bonds.

The authority or any authority or body which may succeed to the powers, duties, and liabilities vested in the authority is authorized at one time, or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost, as defined in this chapter, of any one project or a combination of projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided in subsection (n) of this Code section for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated and shall mature at such times and bear interest at such rates as may be determined by the authority, payable in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company inside or outside the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

In case any officer whose signature appears on any bonds or whose facsimile signature appears on any coupon ceases to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All such bonds shall be signed by the chairman or vice chairman of the authority, and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary of the authority; and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman or vice chairman of the authority. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such person, and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such persons as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized or hold the proper office, although at the date of such bonds such persons may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office.

All revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the state.

The authority may sell bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the authority.

The proceeds of bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman or vice chairman of the authority under such restrictions, if any, as provided by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture mentioned in subsection (k) of this Code section.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

The authority may provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or is destroyed or lost.

Revenue bonds may be issued without the conducting of any proceedings, the existence of any conditions, or the happening of any events other than those proceedings, conditions, and events which are specified or required by this chapter. In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more, including a combination of, projects at any one institution or any number of institutions. Any resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds under this chapter shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted. Any such resolution may be passed at any regular, special, or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

Revenue bonds issued under this chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state. Such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided for in subsections (m) through (p) of this Code section, and the issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section. Anything in this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, such funds as may be received from state appropriations or from any other source are declared to be available and may be used by any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia for the performance of any lease contract entered into by such department, board, commission, or agency with the authority.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of revenue bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company inside or outside of the state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign rents, revenues, and earnings to be received by the authority.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or the trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property, the construction of the project, the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. The resolution or indenture may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or architects employed or designated by the authority and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor. The resolution or indenture may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to such purchasers and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued.

The indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing provisions of this Code section, the trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project and of the cost of the project affected by such indenture.

The authority shall, in the resolution providing for issuance of revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer or person who, or any agency, bank, or trust company which, shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply the same to the purposes expressed in this chapter, subject to such regulations as this chapter and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.

Unless otherwise pledged and allocated, any and all revenues, rents, and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether or not such revenues, rents, and earnings were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been issued, may be pledged and allocated by the authority to the payment of the principal and interest on revenue bonds of the authority as the trust indenture or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide.

Such funds so pledged from whatever source received, which pledge may include funds received from one or more or all sources, shall be set aside at regular intervals, as may be provided in the resolution or trust indenture, into a sinking fund which shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall fall due;

The principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due;

The necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest; and

Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust indenture, such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all revenue bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, or subject to the trust indenture, surplus moneys in the sinking fund may be applied to the purchasing or redemption of bonds, and any such bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be canceled and shall not again be issued.

Except to the extent the rights given in this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of bonds or by a trust indenture, any holder of revenue bonds or interest coupons issued under this chapter, any receiver for such holders, or any indenture trustee, if any, may either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of Georgia or granted by this chapter or under such resolution or trust indenture. Such holder, receiver, or trustee may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter, or by resolution or trust indenture, to be performed by the authority or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project or projects. In the event of default of the authority upon the principal and interest obligations of any revenue bond issue, such holder, receiver, or trustee shall be subrogated to each and every right which the authority may possess and, in the pursuit of his or its remedies as subrogee, may proceed either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings to collect any sums by such proceedings due and owing to the authority and pledged or partially pledged directly or indirectly to the benefit of the revenue bond issue of which such holder, receiver, or trustee is representative. No holder, receiver, or trustee shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon, or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state, nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon the property of the state.

The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under this chapter and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such revenue refunding bonds, the maturities, and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this chapter insofar as the same may be applicable.

While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority, or of its officers, employees, or agents, or of any department, board, commission, or agency of the state shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds. This chapter shall be for the benefit of the state, the authority, and the holders of any such bonds and, upon the issuance of bonds under this chapter, shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36. The petition for validation shall also make party defendant to such action any authority, division, subdivision, instrumentality, or agency of the State of Georgia which, or any person who, has contracted with the Georgia Agricultural Exposition Authority for the use of any building, structure, or facilities for which bonds have been issued and sought to be validated. Such authority, division, subdivision, instrumentality, agency, or person shall be required to show cause, if any, why such contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be inquired into by the court, the validity of the terms thereof determined, and the contract adjudicated as security for the payment of any such bonds of the authority. The bonds when validated and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such bonds and against the authority issuing the same and against any authority, division, subdivision, instrumentality, department, agency, or person contracting with the authority.

No bonds shall be issued by the authority under this chapter unless the issuance of such bonds has been reviewed and approved by the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission.

The bonds authorized by this chapter are made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state; all municipalities and all municipal subdivisions; all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-483, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Code 1981, §

2-3-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “subsection (n)” was substituted for “subsection (b)” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “chapter” was substituted for “part” throughout this Code section.

2-3-15.
Authorization for department construction and acquisition of projects.

The Department of Agriculture is authorized to construct, erect, acquire, and own the project, as defined in this chapter. The costs of any such project may be paid from the proceeds of state general obligation or guaranteed revenue debt. The department is authorized to contract with the authority, the State Properties Commission, the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission, or with any other department, agency, commission, board, official, or person for the construction, operation, maintenance, funding, design, or use of such project.

History.

Code 1981, § 12-3-484, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 801, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 3/HB 125; Code 1981, §

2-3-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 261, § 4/HB 125.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “this chapter” was substituted for “this part” at the end of the first sentence.